Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1906.01
Native American foster homes; rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations establishing separate licensing standards for Native American foster homes located outside the boundaries of any Indian reservation or tribal service area as defined in section 43-1503. The department shall, in consultation with the Commission on Indian Affairs, develop appropriate standards for the licensing of such foster homes. Such standards shall comply with the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978, 25 U.S.C. 1901 et seq., the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, and all other applicable federal and state laws.

Laws 1995, LB 451, § 7;

Laws 1999, LB 475, § 5.

Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, see section 43-1501.